en: Band strength: Heavy-duty; Standard; Other
ja: バンドの強度: ヘビーデューティ; スタンダード; その他
nb: Båndstyrke: Tungt arbeid; Standard; Annet
zh-TW: 帶強度: 重工作; 標準; 其他
fr: Force de bande: À toute épreuve; Standard; Autre
el: Δύναμη λουριού: Μεγάλης αντοχής; Κανονικό; Άλλο
hu: Szíj erőssége: Nagy teherbírású; Normál; Egyéb
hr-HR: Čvrstoća remena: Za teške poslove; Standardna; Ostalo
sv: Bandstyrka: Kraftig; Standard; Övrigt
th: ความแข็งแรงของสายรัด: การใช้งานหนัก; มาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
ru: Прочность резинок: Прочный; Стандартный; Другое
cs: Síla pásma: Náročné podmínky; Standardní; Jiné
it: Resistenza della fascia: Molto pesante; Standard; Altro
nl: Bandsterkte: Zwaar werk; Standaard; Andere
es: Fuerza de la banda: Intensidad alta; Estándar; Otros
sl-SI: Moč traku: Močna; Standardna; Druga
da: Båndstyrke: Kraftig ydelse; Standard; Andet
fi: Siteen voimakkuus: Heavy-duty; Tavallinen; Muu
pl: Wytrzymałość taśmy: Wytrzymały; Standard; Inne
tr: Bant gücü: Ağır hizmet; Standart; Diğer
pt-PT: Resistência da lombada: Serviços pesados; Padrão; Outro
zh-CN: 带强度: 重型; 标准; 其他
vi: Độ bền nẹp: Hạng nặng; Bánh xe tiêu chuẩn; Khác
lt-LT: Dirželio stiprumas: Patvarus; Standartinis; Kita
de: Bandstärke: Schwerlast; Standard; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Trvácnosť remienka: Pevný; Štandardný; Iné
ro-RO: Rezistență curea: Rezistență mare; Standard; Altele
ko: 밴드 강도: 헤비 듀티; 표준; 기타
pt-BR: Resistência da faixa: Resistente; Padrão; Outro
bg-BG: Надеждност на каишката: Тежкотоварен; Стандартно; Други